Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB897.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 103. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"American-made." Produced, manufactured, mined, grown or performed in the United States. For the purpose of this definition, produced or manufactured shall mean assembled in a location within the United States.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. Title 62 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 109. Prioritization of American-made supplies. (a) Prioritization.--The department shall prioritize the procurement of American-made supplies and incorporate the prioritization into the department's procurement policies, procedures and specifications.(b) Determinations.--If the Secretary of General Services determines that a particular supply is not American-made, or is American-made but not available in sufficient quantities to meet the needs of a Commonwealth agency for which the department acts as purchasing agency, the Secretary of General Services shall transmit notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Objections.--Beginning on the date of publication of the notice under subsection (b) and until 30 days thereafter, a person or business may file an objection to the determination in a form and manner determined by the department. A person or business shall include evidence of the particular supply being American-made or evidence of the particular supply being American-made and available in sufficient quantities. An objection under this subsection shall be considered an appeal under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(d) Applicability.--If, after the adjudication of the objection under subsection (c), the determination under subsection (b) is affirmed, the prioritization requirements under subsection (a) shall not apply for the particular supply.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0897PN0939 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930